Maine, session 132, LD1557.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 7 MRSA §604, sub-§22-A, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 673, §1, is amended
to read:
22-A. Perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances or PFAS. "Perfluoroalkyl
and polyfluoroalkyl substances" or "PFAS" has the same meaning as in Title 32, section
1732, subsection 5‑A 40 Code of Federal Regulations, Section 705.3, as amended.
Sec. 2. 38 MRSA §1614, sub-§5, ¶H is enacted to read:
H. Notwithstanding subsection 1, paragraph F, for purposes of the prohibition on the
sale of pesticide products containing intentionally added PFAS under this subsection,
"perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances" or "PFAS" has the same meaning as
in Title 7, section 604, subsection 22-A and "pesticide" has the same meaning as in
Title 7, section 604, subsection 25.